Utah statutes.
78A-12-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Judicial Performance Evaluation Commission established by this chapter.

(2)  "Judge" means a judge or justice who is subject to a retention election.

(3)  "Justice" means a judge who is a member of the Supreme Court.

